Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2352.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; auditor general; county treasurer procedural reviews; intent A. The sum of $2,385,900 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2028-2029 to the auditor general for county treasurer procedural reviews. B. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years.